Hawaii statutes.
§437-39 Enforcement. When necessary,
the board may enforce this chapter, including any rule adopted thereunder or
decision rendered thereunder by applying to the circuit court for any relief
which may be appropriate, including injunctive relief. Further, the board may
apply to the circuit court for any relief which may be appropriate including
injunctive relief to enjoin any licensee or other person who violates or
threatens to violate any provision of this chapter, including any rule adopted
thereunder. [L 1973, c 129, §1(j); am L 1996, c 264, §14]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next